Oklahoma, session 2025, SB691.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3311.19 of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training shall


work in conjunction with the Department of Mental Health and


Substance Abuse Services to develop a voluntary program by which law


enforcement officers can receive specialized training to respond to


calls involving individuals having a mental health crisis.


B. Law enforcement officers who volunteer to partake in such


program and complete the program’s training requirements shall be


designated as law enforcement mental health specialists.

Req. No. 900 Page 1


C. The Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training and


the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services shall


promulgate rules to effectuate the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-900 CN 1/19/2025 5:41:28 AM





































Req. No. 900 Page 2